test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-verbs_gt-norm.yaml
    flúga+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: flýgur
    flúgva+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: fleyg
    flúga+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: fleyg
    flúgva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: flugu
    flúga+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: flugu
    flúgva+V+Sup: flogið
    flúga+V+Sup: flogið
    ljúgva+V+Inf: ljúgva
    lúgva+V+Inf: lúgva
    súgva+V+Inf: súgva
    flúgva+V+Inf: flúgva
    smúgva+V+Inf: smúgva
    súgva+V+Inf: súgva
    kljúgva+V+Inf: kljúgva
    klúgva+V+Inf: klúgva
    seta+V+Inf: seta
    vinna+V+Inf: vinna
    finna+V+Inf: finna
    finna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: finnur
    finna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: fann
    finna+V+Sup: funnið
    vinna+V+Inf: vinna
    spinna+V+Inf: spinna
    svinna+V+Inf: svinna
    finna+V+Inf: finna
    vinna+V+Inf: vinna
    binda+V+Inf: binda
    binda+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bindur
    binda+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bundu
    binda+V+Sup: bundið
    binda+V+Inf: binda
    vinda+V+Inf: vinda
    binda+V+Inf: binda
    vinda+V+Inf: vinda
    stinga+V+Inf: stinga
    springa+V+Inf: springa
    stinga+V+Inf: stinga
    stinga+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: stingur
    stinga+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: stakk
    støkka+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: stakk
    stinga+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: stungu
    stinga+V+Sup: stungið
    stinga+V+Inf: stinga
    svimja+V+Inf: svimja
    svimja+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: svimur
    svimja+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: svam
    svimja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: svumu
    svimja+V+Sup: svomið
    brenna+V+Inf: brenna
    drekka+V+Inf: drekka
    drekka+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: drekkur
    drekka+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: drakk
    drekka+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: drukku
    drekka+V+Sup: drukkið
    drekka+V+Inf: drekka
    renna+V+Inf: renna
    drekka+V+Inf: drekka
    renna+V+Inf: renna
    drekka+V+Inf: drekka
    renna+V+Inf: renna
    renna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: rennur
    renna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: rann
    renna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: runnu
    renna+V+Sup: runnið
    renna+V+Inf: renna
    bresta+V+Inf: bresta
    detta+V+Inf: detta
    detta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: dettur
    detta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: datt
    detta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: duttu
    detta+V+Sup: dottið
    gleppa+V+Inf: gleppa
    gretta+V+Inf: gretta
    nema+V+Inf: nema
    hveppa+V+Inf: hveppa
    kvøtta+V+Inf: kvøtta
    nema+V+Inf: nema
    nerta+V+Inf: nerta
    skelva+V+Inf: skelva
    skreppa+V+Inf: skreppa
    sleppa+V+Inf: sleppa
    sleppa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: sleppur
    sleppa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: slapp
    sleppa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: sluppu
    sleppa+V+Sup: sloppið
    smella+V+Inf: smella
    smetta+V+Inf: smetta
    spretta+V+Inf: spretta
    treffa+V+Inf: treffa
    verpa+V+Inf: verpa
    hvøkka+V+Inf: hvøkka
    røkka+V+Inf: røkka
    røkka+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: røkkur
    røkka+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: rakk
    røkka+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: røkk
    røkka+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: rukku
    røkka+V+Sup: rokkið
    røkka+V+Inf: røkka
    røkka+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: røkkur
    røkka+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: rakk
    røkka+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: røkk
    røkka+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: rukku
    røkka+V+Sup: rokkið
    søkka+V+Inf: søkka
    støkka+V+Inf: støkka
    svølla+V+Inf: svølla
    ganga+V+Inf: ganga
    ganga+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: gongur
    ganga+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: gekk
    ganga+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: gingu
    ganga+V+Sup: gingið
    hanga+V+Inf: hanga
    ganga+V+Inf: ganga
    veva+V+Inf: veva
    vevja+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: vevur
    veva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: vevur
    veva+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: vav
    veva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: vóvu
    veva+V+Sup: vovið
    leypa+V+Inf: leypa
    leypa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: loypur
    leypa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: leyp
    leypa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: lupu
    leypa+V+Sup: lopið
    leypa+V+Inf: leypa
    bera+V+Inf: bera
    bera+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ber
    bera+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: bar
    bera+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bóru
    bera+V+Sup: borið
    bera+V+Inf: bera
    skera+V+Inf: skera
    bera+V+Inf: bera
    skera+V+Inf: skera
    bera+V+Inf: bera
    skera+V+Inf: skera
    bera+V+Inf: bera
    skera+V+Inf: skera
    bera+V+Inf: bera
    skera+V+Inf: skera
    bera+V+Inf: bera
    skera+V+Inf: skera
    bera+V+Inf: bera
    skera+V+Inf: skera
    bera+V+Inf: bera
    fara+V+Inf: fara
    endafara+V+Inf: endafara
    endafara+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: endafer
    endafara+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: endafór
    endafara+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: endafóru
    endafara+V+Sup: endafarið
    fara+V+Inf: fara
    fara+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: fer
    fara+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: fór
    fara+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: fóru
    fara+V+Sup: farið
    fara+V+Inf: fara
    drepa+V+Inf: drepa
    geva+V+Inf: geva
    geva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: gevur
    geva+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: gav
    geva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: góvu
    geva+V+Sup: givið
    geva+V+Inf: geva
    drepa+V+Inf: drepa
    lesa+V+Inf: lesa
    leka+V+Inf: leka
    lesa+V+Inf: lesa
    lesa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: lesur
    lesa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: las
    lesa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: lósu
    lesa+V+Sup: lisið
    lesa+V+Inf: lesa
    geva+V+Inf: geva
    lesa+V+Inf: lesa
    reka+V+Inf: reka
    geva+V+Inf: geva
    drepa+V+Inf: drepa
    lesa+V+Inf: lesa
    reka+V+Inf: reka
    drepa+V+Inf: drepa
    lesa+V+Inf: lesa
    geva+V+Inf: geva
    reka+V+Inf: reka
    drepa+V+Inf: drepa
    geva+V+Inf: geva
    lesa+V+Inf: lesa
    reka+V+Inf: reka
    geva+V+Inf: geva
    gita+V+Inf: gita
    gita+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: gitir
    gita+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: gitti
    gita+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: gittu
    gita+V+Sup: gitt
    gita+V+PrfPrc: gittur
    sita+V+Inf: sita
    sita+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: situr
    sita+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: sat
    sita+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: sótu
    sita+V+Sup: sitið
    sitja+V+Inf: sitja
    sita+V+Inf: sita
    ala+V+Inf: ala
    gala+V+Inf: gala
    mala+V+Inf: mala
    mala+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: melur
    mala+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: mól
    mala+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: mólu
    mala+V+Sup: malið
    stjala+V+Inf: stjala
    stjala+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: stjelur
    stjala+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: stjól
    stjala+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: stjólu
    aka+V+Inf: aka
    taka+V+Inf: taka
    grava+V+Inf: grava
    taka+V+Inf: taka
    grava+V+Inf: grava
    taka+V+Inf: taka
    taka+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: tekur
    taka+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: tók
    taka+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: tóku
    taka+V+Sup: tikið
    taka+V+Inf: taka
    halda+V+Inf: halda
    hella+V+PrfPrc: heldur
    halda+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: heldur
    hella+V+Sup: helt
    hálda+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hildu
    halda+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hildu
    hálda+V+Sup: hildið
    halda+V+Sup: hildið
    hálda+V+Inf: hálda
    halda+V+Inf: halda
    sova+V+Inf: sova
    sova+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: svevur
    sova+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: svav
    sova+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: svóvu
    sova+V+Inf: sova
    koma+V+Inf: koma
    koma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: kemur
    koma+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: kom
    koma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: komu
    koma+V+Sup: komið
    koma+V+Inf: koma
    láta+V+Inf: láta
    lata+V+Inf: lata
    láta+V+Inf: láta
    láta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: letur
    láta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: læt
    láta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: lótu
    láta+V+Sup: látið
    standa+V+Inf: standa
    standa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: stendur
    standa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: stóð
    standa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: stóðu
    standa+V+Sup: staðið
    standa+V+Inf: standa
    biðja+V+Inf: biðja
    biðja+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: biður
    biðja+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: bað
    biðja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bóðu
    biðja+V+Sup: biðið
    biðja+V+Inf: biðja
    draga+V+Inf: draga
    draga+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: dregur
    draga+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: dró
    draga+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: drógu
    draga+V+Inf: draga
    hvørva+V+Inf: hvørva
    hvørva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hvørvur
    hvørva+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hvarv
    hvørva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hvurvu
    hvørva+V+Sup: horvið
    hvørva+V+Sup: hvorvið
    hvørva+V+Inf: hvørva
    sláa+V+Inf: sláa
    sláa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: slær
    sláa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: sló
    sláa+V+Inf: sláa
    siga+V+Inf: siga
    siga+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: sigur
    siga+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: segði
    siga+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: søgdu
    siga+V+Sup: sagt
    siga+V+PrfPrc: sagdur
    skerja+V+Inf: skerja
    skerja+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: skerdi
    skerja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: skerdu
    skerja+V+Inf: skerja
    eta+V+Inf: eta
    eta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: etur
    eta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: át
    eta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: ótu
    eta+V+Sup: etið
    eta+V+Inf: eta
    læa+V+Inf: læa
    grindast+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: grindast
    grindast+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: grindaðist
    grindast+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: grindaðist
    grindast+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: grindast
